Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1323
Refusal to deliver property; action to enforce delivery.

If any person refuses to deliver property to the State Treasurer as required under sections 69-1301 to 69-1329, he shall bring an action in a court of appropriate jurisdiction to enforce such delivery.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 23, p. 2490.